Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1511
Deed record; mortgage record; duty to keep.

In counties where the book form of recording instruments is used, different sets of books shall be provided for the recording of deeds and mortgages. In one of the sets all conveyances absolute in their terms and not intended as mortgages or as securities in the nature of mortgages shall be recorded, and in the other set such mortgages and securities shall be recorded.

Laws 1879, § 81, p. 376;

R.S.1913, § 5626;

C.S.1922, § 4953;

C.S.1929, § 26-1211;

R.S.1943, § 23-1511;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 7.

Assignment for creditors, containing only personal property, need not be recorded with register of deeds, but should be filed within twenty-four hours. Lancaster County Bank v. Horn, 34 Neb. 742, 52 N.W. 562 (1892).